Utah statutes.
53A-3-301.   Superintendent of schools -- Appointment -- Qualifications -- Term -- Compensation.

(1)  A local school board shall appoint a district superintendent of schools who serves as the board's chief executive officer.

(2) (a)  The board shall appoint the superintendent on the basis of outstanding professional qualifications.

(b)  The superintendent's term of office is for two years and until a successor is appointed and qualified.

(3)  If it becomes necessary to appoint an interim superintendent due to a vacancy in the office of superintendent, then the board shall make an appointment during a public meeting for an indefinite term not to exceed one year, which term shall end upon the appointment and qualification of a new superintendent.

(4) (a)  The superintendent shall hold an administrative/supervisory license issued by the State Board of Education, except as otherwise provided in Subsection (4)(b).

(b)  A local board of education may request, and the State Board of Education may grant, a letter of authorization permitting a person with outstanding professional qualifications to serve as superintendent without holding an administrative/supervisory license.

(5)  The board shall set the superintendent's compensation for services.

(6)  The superintendent qualifies for office by taking the constitutional oath of office.

